Hawaii statutes.
§603-6 Residence of judge. Every judge
of a circuit court shall reside in the circuit for which the judge is
appointed. [L 1892, c 57, pt of §30; RL 1925, §2242; RL 1935, §3638; RL 1945,
§9636; RL 1955, §215-6; HRS §603-6; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next